Maryland, session 2025, SB0355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
8.3–601.
(a) (1) Beginning July 1, [2025] 2027, each employee of an employer, each
employer with 15 or more employees, and each self–employed individual participating in
the Program shall contribute to the Fund.
(b) (1) Subject to subsection (a)(2) of this section, on or before February 1,
[2025] 2027, the Secretary shall set the total rate of contribution based on available cost
analyses of the Program.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0355*

SENATE BILL 355
(2) The rate set under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be in effect for
the period from July 1, [2025] 2027, to June 30, [2026] 2028, both inclusive.
(c) (1) On or before November 15 each year, beginning in [2026] 2028, the
Secretary shall conduct a cost analysis of the Program that is focused on the cost of
maintaining solvency and paying benefits to covered individuals that will be used to
determine the appropriate total rate of contribution to the Fund.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection and subsection (a)(2) of this
section, on or before February 1 each year, beginning in [2026] 2028, the Secretary shall
set the total rate of contribution that will be in effect for the 12–month period beginning on
the immediately following July 1.
(2) The rate set under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be based on
the cost analysis required under subsection (c) of this section.
8.3–701.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, beginning July 1, [2026]
2028, a covered individual taking leave from employment may submit a claim for benefits:
(i) 1. to care for a newborn child of the covered individual during
the first year after the child’s birth; or
2. because a child is being placed for adoption, foster care, or
kinship care with the covered individual or to care for or bond with the child during the
first year after the placement;
(ii) to care for a family member with a serious health condition;
(iii) to attend to a serious health condition that results in the covered
individual being unable to perform the functions of the covered individual’s position;
(iv) to care for a service member with a serious health condition
resulting from military service for whom the covered individual is next of kin; or
(v) to attend to a qualifying exigency arising out of the deployment
of a service member who is a family member of the covered individual.
8.3–703.
(b) (3) The weekly benefit amount payable under paragraph (1) of this
subsection:
(i) shall be at least $50; and
(ii) may not exceed:

SENATE BILL 355 3
1. for the 6–month period beginning July 1, [2026] 2028,
$1,000; and
2. for the 12–month period beginning January 1, [2027]
2029, and each subsequent 12–month period, the amount determined and announced by
the Secretary under paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(4) (i) In this paragraph, “Consumer Price Index” means the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Washington–Arlington–Alexandria,
DC–VA–MD–WV metropolitan area or a successor index published by the federal Bureau
of Labor Statistics.
(ii) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, for the 12–month period
beginning January 1, [2027] 2029, and each subsequent 12–month period, the maximum
weekly benefit amount shall be increased by the amount, rounded to the nearest cent, that
equals the product of:
1. the maximum weekly benefit amount in effect for the
immediately preceding 12–month period; and
2. the annual percentage growth in the Consumer Price
Index for the immediately preceding 12–month period, as determined by the Secretary
under subparagraph (iii)1 of this paragraph.
(iii) Beginning September 1, [2026] 2028, and on each subsequent
September 1, the Secretary shall determine and announce:
1. the annual percentage growth, if any, in the Consumer
Price Index based on the most recent 12–month period for which data are available on
September 1; and
2. the maximum weekly benefit amount effective for the
12–month period beginning the immediately following January 1.
(e) (2) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, on or before September 1
each year, beginning in [2026] 2028, the Board shall determine whether the seasonally
adjusted total employment from the Current Employment Statistics series as reported by
the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics for the most recent 6–month period is negative as
compared with the immediately preceding 6–month period.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.